Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5226.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406pp. (1) A health insurance policy delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state must provide coverage for the treatment of pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated with streptococcal infections and pediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndrome, including, but not limited to, the use of intravenous immunoglobulin therapy. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act applies to health insurance policies delivered, executed, issued, amended, adjusted, or renewed in this state, or outside of this state if covering residents of this state, beginning 90 days after the date this amendatory act is enacted into law.